Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 10.2 Rhode Island Local Government Investment Pool

35-10.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Local Government Investment Pool Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to enable eligible governmental entities to participate with the state in providing maximum opportunities for the investment of public funds consistent with safety and protection of such funds. It is the intention of the general assembly in enabling the general treasurer with the approval of the state investment commission to establish the said investment pools, that the general treasurer and state investment commission consider the importance of retaining deposits with the banks located and operating within the state, that further consideration be given to a bank’s commitment to the various communities within the state, the bank’s role as an employer within the state, as well as the bank’s commitment to the growth of economic development within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms, unless the context requires a different interpretation, have the following meanings:

“Commission” means the state investment commission;

“Participation Unit” means the equal proportionate share into which the beneficial interest in the trust is divided and includes a fraction of a unit as well as whole units.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-4.
Establishing investment pools.

Notwithstanding and general or special law or regulation to the contrary, the general treasurer may establish, subject to the approval of the commission, one or more investment pool trust funds containing certain monies in accordance with §

35-10.2-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-5.
Monies included in investment pools.

Each investment pool trust fund may contain any or a combination of any of the following:

Monies of the several funds of the state according to §

35-10-2

;

The proceeds of all bond issues not immediately required; or

The funds under the custody of agencies, authorities, commissions, boards, municipalities, political subdivisions and other public units of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-6.
Trustee of the funds.

The general treasurer shall serve as trustee for each established investment pool trust fund in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-7.
Investment of funds.

The general treasurer shall invest each investment pool trust fund in instruments prescribed, and in amounts approved, by the commission in accordance with §

35-10-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-8.
Participation units.

The general treasurer is authorized to sell to all agencies, authorities, commissions, boards, municipalities, political subdivisions, and other public units of the state, participation units in any such combined investment trust fund. Such participation units are made legal investments for all the funds under the custody of such agencies, authorities, commissions, boards, municipalities, political subdivisions, and other public units of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-9.
Reporting.

The general treasurer shall keep a separate account of each participant having funds in the investment pool. Each separate account shall record the individual amounts deposited in the investment pool, the date of withdrawals, and the earnings credited or paid. The general treasurer shall report monthly the status of the respective account to each participant having funds in the pool during the previous month.

At the end of each fiscal year, the general treasurer shall submit to the governor and the state auditor a summary of the activity of the investment pool. The summary shall indicate the quantity of funds deposited; the earnings of the pool; the investments purchased, sold, or exchanged; the administrative expenses of the investment pool; and such other information as the state treasurer deems relevant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-10.
Rules and regulations.

The general treasurer, subject to the approval of the commission, shall by rule prescribe the time periods for investments in the investment pool and the procedure for withdrawal of funds from the investment pool. The state treasurer shall promulgate such other rules as are deemed necessary for the efficient operation of the investment pool.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.

35-10.2-11.
Severability.

The holding of any section or sections or parts thereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 307, § 1.